dev/verb/verb.ne.dix
  <!-- ठम्याउ; ठम्याउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ठम्याउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पुग्; पुग; 2 -->
    <pardef n="पुग/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोस</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पुग्; पुग; 13 -->
    <pardef n="पुग/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्न</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्थें</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नोस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छयौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दछ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चड्; चड्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चड्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बिताउ; बिताउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बिताउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बग्; बग्; 2 -->
    <pardef n="बग्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हेरे; हेरे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हेरे__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लखेट्; लखेट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लखेट/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लखेट्; लखेट्; 2 -->
    <pardef n="लखेट्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हुन्छन्; हुन्छन्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हुन्छन्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अटाउ; अटाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अटाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुइँक्याइ; सुइँक्याइ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सुइँक्याइ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दिने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हेर्; हेर; 5 -->
    <pardef n="हेर/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौँ</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौला</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुहोस</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ठम्याउ"><i>ठम्याउ</i><par n="ठम्याउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पुग्"><i>पुग</i><par n="पुग/्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="पुग्"><i>पुग</i><par n="पुग/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="चड्"><i>चड्</i><par n="चड्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बिताउ"><i>बिताउ</i><par n="बिताउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बग्"><i>बग्</i><par n="बग्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हेरे"><i>हेरे</i><par n="हेरे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लखेट्"><i>लखेट</i><par n="लखेट/्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="लखेट्"><i>लखेट्</i><par n="लखेट्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हुन्छन्"><i>हुन्छन्</i><par n="हुन्छन्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="अटाउ"><i>अटाउ</i><par n="अटाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सुइँक्याइ"><i>सुइँक्याइ</i><par n="सुइँक्याइ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हेर्"><i>हेर</i><par n="हेर/्__opt"/></e>
